Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Critical infrastructure information”  means information about infrastructure that is
so vital to this state or the United States that the incapacity or destruction of  the
infrastructure would detrimentally affect the personal and economic security,  health or
safety of residents of this state, including information  about the security of items listed in
ORS 192.502 (33).
(2) “Custodian” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.410 (1)(b).
(3) “Geographic information” means geographic data as that term is defined in  ORS
291.039 (4)(b).
(4) “Geographic information system” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 291.039
(4)(b).
(5) “Geospatial framework  data” means geographic information that a public body, under
applicable provisions of law or on the basis of scientific methodology, technical standards  or
technical expertise,  creates, generates, provides or aggregates and that the Oregon Ge-
ographic Information Council, in consultation with the public body, identifies  as necessary
to support the business processes of a governmental agency.
(6) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon  Geographic Information Council is established within the
office of the State Chief Information Officer. The State Chief Information  Officer shall pro-
vide administrative and staff support and facilities that are necessary for the  council to
carry out the purposes set forth in this section. The purposes of the council are to:
(a) Serve as  the statewide governing body for sharing and managing geospatial frame-
work data;
(b) Oversee the preparation and maintenance of a plan to enhance geographic  framework
information sharing and  management and to enhance coordination with respect to ge-
ographic framework information among public bodies within this state; and
(c) Coordinate geospatial framework data sharing and management that occurs among
public bodies.
(2) The membership of the council consists of:
(a) Two members of the Legislative Assembly appointed as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 1
(A) The President of the Senate shall appoint one member from the Senate  who has an
interest in geographic information systems and in enhancing geospatial framework  data
sharing among public bodies; and
(B) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint one member from the
House of Representatives who has an interest in geographic  information systems and in en-
hancing geospatial framework data sharing among public bodies.
(b) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) One member who represents Indian tribes, as defined in ORS 97.740;
(B) One member who represents the Association of Oregon Counties;
(C) One member who represents the League of Oregon Cities;
(D) One member who represents the Special Districts Association of Oregon;
(E) One member who represents regional governments or councils of  government within
this state;
(F) One member who represents the Oregon State Association of County Assessors;
(G) One member  who represents a public safety answering point, as defined in ORS
403.105, within this state;
(H) One member who represents the public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(I) One member who represents a federal agency  that is concerned with collecting,
managing or disseminating geospatial framework data;
(J) One member who represents a public utility within this state;
(K) One member who is a geographic information  systems manager for a county or city
in this state;
(L) One member who represents the public and who has an  interest in geographic infor-
mation systems and in enhancing geospatial framework data sharing among public bodies;
(M) The state  geographic information officer that the State Chief Information Officer
appoints under section 6 of this 2017 Act;
(N) One member who represents a nonprofit  professional organization with an interest
in geographic information systems and  in enhancing geospatial data sharing among public
bodies;
(O) Three members from state agencies with responsibility for water, land,  air quality,
natural resources or infrastructure;
(P) Two members from state agencies with  responsibilities for public health, human
services, education or economic or community development; and
(Q) Two members from state agencies with responsibility for public safety or  emergency
management.
(3) Each group or entity identified in subsection (2)(b) of this section may recommend
an individual from the group or entity for membership on the council.
(4) Members of the Legislative Assembly  appointed to the council are nonvoting members
and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(5)(a) A majority of the voting members of the  council constitutes a quorum for trans-
acting business.
(b) A majority of the voting members of  the council must approve the council’s official
actions.
(6) The council shall elect one of the council’s members to serve as chairperson and  one
member to serve as  vice chairperson. The council shall specify in the charter described in
section 3 (1)(d) of this 2017 Act a process  by which the council selects the chairperson and
vice chairperson and the terms of office for the chairperson and vice chairperson.
(7)(a) The term  of office for each voting member of the council is four years, but the
member serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
(b) Before a voting member’s term expires,  the Governor shall appoint a successor,
whose term begins on January 1 following  the Governor’s appointment. A voting member is
eligible for reappointment.
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 2
(c) A  nonvoting member’s term of office is two years. A nonvoting member is eligible for
reappointment.
(d) If a vacancy occurs on the council for any reason,  the appointing authority shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective and the new member shall serve  for
the remainder of the term.
(8) The council shall meet at times and  places that the chairperson or a majority of the
voting members of the council specifies.
(9) Members of the council who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly may not
receive compensation, but the State Chief Information Officer, at the State  Chief Informa-
tion Officer’s discretion, may reimburse council members for actual and necessary travel
and other expenses the members incur in performing the members’ official  duties, in the
manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495, from funds appropriated  to the State Chief
Information Officer for carrying out the council’s purposes.
(10) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, shall assist the council
in performing the  council’s duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, shall furnish information and advice the council considers necessary to per-
form the council’s duties.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Geographic Information Council has the exclusive power to:
(a) Serve as  the statewide governing body for sharing and managing geospatial frame-
work data that public bodies share under sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act;
(b) Develop and update every four years a  strategic plan to manage geospatial framework
data that aligns as closely as possible with the  Enterprise Information Resources Manage-
ment Strategy described in ORS 291.039 and oversee the implementation of the plan;
(c) Adopt, in consultation with  the State Chief Information Officer, rules, policies and
standards that identify geospatial framework data that  public bodies must share and that
specify how frequently public bodies must share the geospatial framework data;
(d) Recommend an  allocation of responsibilities among public bodies for collecting, using,
managing, sharing and maintaining geospatial framework data and  devise and recommend
terms under which public bodies share geospatial framework data;
(e) Adopt charters, rules, policies  and procedures for carrying out the council’s purposes
under section 2 of this 2017 Act;
(f) Establish subcommittees,  work groups and other bodies or methods of organization
that the council deems necessary to carry out the council’s purposes under  section 2 of this
2017 Act; and
(g) Establish and appoint members to advisory committees for the purposes described  in
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The Oregon Geographic Information Council shall:
(a) Lead and coordinate efforts to accumulate,  disseminate, analyze and manage ge-
ographic information, including efforts that:
(A) Provide a statewide forum for  discussing and resolving issues related to geographic
information management;
(B) Develop and maintain partnerships for managing  geographic information among
public bodies; and
(C) Identify best practices for managing geographic  information and geographic infor-
mation systems and determine whether  and how to apply the best practices within this state.
(b) Recommend laws, rules, policies and strategies for improving geographic information
collection, dissemination, analysis and management to the Legislative Assembly, the  United
States Congress, public bodies and other individuals and entities.
(c) Develop and submit each biennium  to the State Chief Information Officer for approval
a plan and a budget for collecting,  using, managing, sharing and maintaining geospatial
framework data and for maintaining  a geospatial data library within the office of the State
Chief Information Officer.
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 3
(d) Work with public bodies to:
(A) Coordinate the activities of public bodies that relate to  collecting, using, managing,
sharing and maintaining geospatial framework data;
(B) Develop strategies to improve  geospatial framework data sharing, to reduce dupli-
cation of effort and to improve the  coordination described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph;
(C) Identify the types, categories, forms and other classifications of geospatial framework
data that public bodies, private entities and the public need;
(D) Disseminate information about projects that various public  bodies are undertaking
with respect to geospatial framework data and other geographic information;
(E) Invite participation in developing, reviewing and updating the strategic plan described
in subsection (1)(b) of this section;
(F) Recommend legislation to enhance geospatial framework data  management and
sharing among public bodies; and
(G) Recommend to  the Legislative Assembly strategies for eliminating the fees that
public bodies charge to other public bodies for geospatial framework data under  ORS 190.050
or 192.440.
(e) Review  periodically plans, grant proposals and budget requests that public bodies
make for the purpose of digital  mapping and identify opportunities for collaboration and
shared investment that reduce unnecessary duplication of effort.
(f) Report on the plan  described in paragraph (c) of this subsection and the council’s
other activities to the State Chief Information Officer, the Governor and  the Joint Legisla-
tive Committee on Information Management and Technology on or before March 1 of each
odd-numbered year.
(3)(a) The council may  establish an advisory committee for any purpose, and, subject to
paragraph (b) of this subsection, membership on an advisory committee is open to  any per-
son.
(b) If the council establishes one or more  advisory committees for the purpose of advis-
ing the council concerning the development, collection, sharing or aggregation  of geospatial
framework data, the council shall establish each advisory committee with reference to  the
committee members’ expertise or ability to advise the council concerning  a particular cate-
gory of geospatial framework data.
(c) Each advisory committee the council establishes under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section shall:
(A) Identify particular geospatial framework data that public bodies should share;
(B) Recommend a schedule for sharing the geospatial framework data that the  commit-
tee identifies in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Recommend processes,  work flow, procedures and necessary funding for collecting,
using, managing, sharing and maintaining geospatial framework data; and
(D)(i) Recommend and coordinate recommendations from  other sources for data formats,
security standards and other standards for collecting,  storing, transferring, maintaining and
managing geospatial framework data;
(ii) Submit the  recommendations to the council and the State Chief Information Officer;
and
(iii) Update and revise the recommendations periodically to account for new circum-
stances.
(d) Members of an advisory committee may not receive compensation, but the State Chief
Information Officer, at the State Chief Information  Officer’s discretion, may reimburse
members of an advisory committee for  actual and necessary travel and other expenses the
members incur in performing the members’ duties, in the  manner and amounts provided for
in ORS  292.495, from funds appropriated to the State Chief Information Officer for the car-
rying out the council’s purposes.
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 4
SECTION 4. (1)(a) Subject to ORS 192.410 to 192.505 and except as provided  in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, a public body shall share all  geospatial framework data that the
Oregon Geographic Information Council designates for sharing if:
(A) The public body does not incur costs  other than the costs that the public body would
incur as a custodian of the geospatial framework data; and
(B) The public body uses existing data and  existing resources to share the geospatial
framework data.
(b) Critical infrastructure information is not subject to the  requirement under paragraph
(a) of this subsection to share geospatial framework data, but  a public body may choose to
share with other public bodies critical infrastructure  information of which the public body
is a custodian under conditions the public body specifies.
(2)(a) A public body that shares geospatial framework data  in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section shall:
(A) Share the geospatial framework  data in compliance with standards for data inter-
change, data formatting and data storage that the Oregon Geographic Information Council
adopts by rule. If the council has not  adopted standards or if the public body does not ordi-
narily maintain the geospatial framework data in accordance with the standards the council
adopts, the public body shall share the geospatial framework data in the format in which the
public body ordinarily maintains the geospatial framework data.
(B) Share the geospatial framework data  at intervals that the council specifies by rule
or, if the council does not specify an interval by  rule, share the geospatial framework data
annually.
(C) Retain custody of the public body’s geospatial framework data.
(b) A public body that shares geospatial framework data in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section may:
(A) Transfer copies of the geospatial framework data to the  State Chief Information Of-
ficer for storage in the geospatial data library described in section 3 (2)(c)  of this 2017 Act
and direct requests for the geospatial framework data to the  individual that the State Chief
Information Officer appoints under section 6 of this 2017 Act.
(B) Share the geospatial  framework data without entering into a written agreement with
another public body.
(C) Prohibit the sharing or redistribution of the public body’s geospatial framework data
if the public body notifies the Oregon Geographic  Information Council in writing that the
geospatial framework data is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.410 to 192.505  because
the public body claims a copyright or other  proprietary interest in the geospatial framework
data or for another reason the public body specifies in the notice.
(D) Withhold from public disclosure geospatial framework  data that the council desig-
nates by rule as critical infrastructure information.
(c) A public body that receives geospatial framework data from another public  body may
not redistribute the  geospatial framework data without specific authorization from the public
body that shared the geospatial framework data.
(3) A public body that shares geospatial framework data in accordance  with subsection
(1) of this section is not liable for:
(a) Omissions, inaccuracies or  other errors or defects in the geospatial framework data;
or
(b) Damages, losses or claims  that arise from receiving or using the geospatial frame-
work data.
(4) The individual that the State Chief Information Officer appoints under section 6  of
this 2017 Act shall:
(a) Take all reasonably necessary measures to:
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 5
(A) Secure information in the geospatial data library  described in section 3 (2)(c) of this
2017 Act in accordance with standards, policies and procedures established or rules  adopted
by the State Chief Information Officer under ORS 182.122;
(B) Protect the availability,  integrity and confidentiality of the geospatial data library;
and
(C) Ensure that  a recipient of geospatial framework data complies with the prohibitions
a public body places on sharing or  redistributing the geospatial framework data under sub-
section (2)(b)(C) of this section.
(b) Provide secure  electronic means by which a public body may transmit geospatial
framework data to and obtain geospatial framework data from the geospatial data library.
SECTION 5. (1) The  Oregon Geographic Information Council Fund is established in the
State Treasury separate and distinct from  the General Fund. All moneys that the State Chief
Information Officer collects or receives for the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 6 of this
2017 Act must be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Oregon  Geographic In-
formation Council Fund. Moneys in the fund may be invested in the same  manner as other
state moneys and the earnings of any investments must be credited to the fund.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer shall keep a record of all moneys deposited into
the fund that  indicates, by separate account, the source from which the moneys are derived,
the interest earned and the activity or program against which any withdrawal is charged.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State  Chief Information Of-
ficer for:
(a) Developing, acquiring and  maintaining geospatial framework data and activities re-
lated to sharing geospatial framework data among public bodies; and
(b) Paying the costs associated with the Oregon Geographic Information Council.
(4) The State Chief  Information Officer may accept gifts, grants, donations and contrib-
utions from the federal government or agencies of the federal  government or from any other
public or private source and may agree to any conditions placed on the gift, grant, donation
or contribution that is in  accordance with applicable law and sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act.
(5) The State  Chief Information Officer and the Oregon Geographic Information Council
shall submit to the Legislative  Assembly and the Governor by December 31 of each even-
numbered year a report that summarizes the balance in the fund,  lists the deposits into and
expenditures from the fund and provides such other details as are necessary to enable the
Legislative Assembly and the Governor to understand the operations of the fund.
SECTION 6.
(1) The State  Chief Information Officer shall establish and appoint an indi-
vidual as a state geographic  information officer to fill a full-time equivalent position that
manages and oversees the daily operations of  the office of the State Chief Information Offi-
cer that concern or are related to geographic information and geospatial framework data.
(2) The individual that the State Chief Information Officer appoints  under subsection (1)
of this section must be, by training and experience, well qualified for  and capable of per-
forming the following duties:
(a) Serving as the State Chief Information Officer’s  principal advisor concerning ge-
ographic information systems,  geospatial framework data and other programs and issues
that concern geographic information;
(b) Communicating and coordinating  with tribal, regional and local governments in this
state, state agencies, the federal government and other public bodies on  issues that concern
geospatial framework data and sharing geospatial framework data;
(c) Serving as the State Chief Information Officer’s representative  on the Oregon Ge-
ographic Information Council;
(d) Taking a leading role in coordinating the council’s development and maintenance of
the strategic plan described in section 3 (1)(b) of  this 2017 Act, in overseeing the implemen-
tation of the plan and in conducting the council’s activities, as described in sections 2  and 3
of this 2017 Act;
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 6
(e) Taking responsibility  for and directing the efforts described in section 4 (4) of this
2017 Act;
(f) Coordinating with the Federal Geographic  Data Committee, the United States
Geological Survey and other federal agencies in developing geospatial framework data in this
state;
(g) Serving as the State Chief Information Officer’s liaison for existing or proposed fed-
eral programs that relate to creating or maintaining  geospatial framework data in this state;
(h) Representing  the state on the National States Geographic Information Council and
in local, regional and  national programs and efforts that are related to geographic informa-
tion systems and managing geographic information;
(i) Overseeing compliance with rules adopted and policies, standards and plans estab-
lished by the State Chief Information Officer or the Oregon Geographic Information  Council
with respect to geographic framework data and geographic information systems;
(j) Consulting and collaborating with, supporting and providing  services to public bodies
and other stakeholders on projects  that are related to geospatial framework data or other
geographic information;
(k) Leading development and deployment for, and overseeing  the continuing operation,
maintenance, support and enhancement of, the geospatial  data library described in section
3 (2)(c) of this 2017 Act on behalf of public bodies in this state; and
(L) Performing other duties that the State Chief Information Officer specifies.
SECTION 7.
(1)(a) Sections 1, 2, 3, 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act become operative on  January
1, 2018.
(b) Section 4 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on January 2, 2020.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer may adopt rules and take any  other action before
the operative date specified in subsection  (1)(a) of this section that is necessary to enable the
State Chief Information Officer to exercise, on and after the operative date specified  in
subsection (1)(a) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the
State Chief Information Officer or  the Oregon Geographic Information Council by sections
1, 2, 3, 5 and 6 of this 2017 Act.
(3) A public body that is subject to section 4 of this 2017 Act may adopt rules, ordinances
or resolutions and take any other action before  the operative date specified in subsection
(1)(b) of this section that  is necessary to enable the public body to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection  (1)(b) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the public body by section 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2017 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 7
Passed by House May 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 18, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2906 (HB 2906-A) Page 8